Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB520.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "oral communication" in section 5702 of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 5702. Definitions.As used in this chapter, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324 context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Oral communication." Any oral communication uttered by a person possessing an expectation that such communication is not subject to interception under circumstances justifying such expectation. The term does not include the following:(1) An electronic communication.(2) A communication made in the presence of a law enforcement officer on official duty who is in uniform or otherwise clearly identifiable as a law enforcement officer and who is using an electronic, mechanical or other device which has been approved under section 5706(b)(4) (relating to exceptions to prohibitions in possession, sale, distribution, manufacture or advertisement of electronic, mechanical or other devices) to intercept the communication in the course of law enforcement duties. As used in this paragraph only, "law enforcement officer" means [a member of the Pennsylvania State Police, an individual employed as a police officer who holds a current certificate under 53 Pa.C.S. Ch. 21 Subch. D (relating to municipal police education and training), a sheriff or a deputy sheriff.(3) A communication made in the presence of an agent, as defined in 61 Pa.C.S. § 6101 (relating to definitions), who meets all of the following:(i) Is clearly identifiable and on official duty.(ii) Is using an electronic, mechanical or other device that has been approved under section 5706(b)(4) to intercept a wire, electronic or oral communication in the course of official duties.(iii) Has received training on the device.20250SB0520PN1010 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iv) Has provided prior written notice to a person under the lawful supervision of State parole that an agent, as defined in 61 Pa.C.S. § 6101, may intercept communications with the person.(4) A communication made in the presence of an individual employed in the Department of Corrections, Bureau of Investigations and Intelligence holding a police officer commission under the act of May 21, 1943 (P.L.469, No.210), entitled "An act providing for commissioning as police officers certain employes of institutions maintained in whole or in part by the Commonwealth; conferring upon them the powers of constables in certain cases; and imposing duties on wardens and keepers of jails, police stations and lock-ups," who meets all of the following:(i) Is clearly identifiable and on official duty.(ii) Is using an electronic, mechanical or other device that has been approved under section 5706(b)(4) to intercept a wire, electronic or oral communication in the course of official duties.(iii) Has received training on the device.(iv) Is not intercepting a communication from inside the residence of an employee of the Department of Corrections without the consent of the employee or prior court approval.] any of the following:(i) A member of the Pennsylvania State Police.(ii) An individual employed as a police officer who holds a current certificate under 53 Pa.C.S. Ch. 21 Subch. D (relating to municipal police education and training).(iii) An agent of the Office of Attorney General as 20250SB0520PN1010 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 described under paragraph (2) of the definition of "enforcement officer" in 71 Pa.C.S. § 5102 (relating to definitions).(iv) A sheriff or a deputy sheriff.(v) Waterways conservation officers or deputy waterways conservation officers as the terms are defined under 30 Pa.C.S. § 102 (relating to definitions).(vi) An officer as defined under 34 Pa.C.S. § 102 (relating to definitions).(vii) An individual employed by the Department of Conservation and Natural Resources who is vested with powers of arrest under section 302(c) or 303(a)(7) of the act of June 28, 1995 (P.L.89, No.18), known as the Conservation and Natural Resources Act.(viii) An agent as defined in 61 Pa.C.S. § 6101 (relating to definitions).(ix) An individual employed by the Department of Corrections Bureau of Investigations and Intelligence holding a police officer commission under the act of May 21, 1943 (P.L.469, No.210), entitled "An act providing for commissioning as police officers certain employes of institutions maintained in whole or in part by the Commonwealth; conferring upon them the powers of constables in certain cases; and imposing duties on wardens and keepers of jails, police stations and lock-ups ." ," PROVIDED THAT THE INDIVIDUAL IS NOT INTERCEPTING THE COMMUNICATION FROM INSIDE THE RESIDENCE OF AN EMPLOYEE OF THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS WITHOUT THE CONSENT OF THE EMPLOYEE OR PRIOR COURT APPROVAL.* * *20250SB0520PN1010 - 4 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 2. Section 5729 of Title 18 is repealed:[§ 5729. Public access.A request for access to audio and video recordings made by an agent, as defined in 61 Pa.C.S. § 6101 (relating to definitions), under this chapter shall not be subject to the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law, and shall follow the access procedures provided for under 42 Pa.C.S. Ch. 67A (relating to recordings by law enforcement officers).]Section 3. Section 901(c) of Title 30 is amended to read:§ 901. Powers and duties of waterways conservation officers and deputies.* * *[(c) Exception to the prohibition of interception and disclosure of communications.--A waterways conservation officer whose duty it is to enforce this title and who has received training on the use of body cameras in a course approved by the Pennsylvania State Police shall be defined as a law enforcement officer for the purpose of 18 Pa.C.S. § 5704(16)(iii) (relating to exceptions to prohibition of interception and disclosure of communications). Such waterways conservation officers may wear body cameras in the performance of their official duties. This subsection shall not apply to a deputy waterways conservation officer.]Section 4. Section 901(b.1) of Title 34 is amended to read:§ 901. Powers and duties of enforcement officers.* * *[(b.1) Exception to the prohibition of interception and disclosure of communications.--An officer whose duty it is to enforce this title and who has received training on the use of 20250SB0520PN1010 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 an electronic, mechanical or other device which has been approved under 18 Pa.C.S. § 5706(b)(4) (relating to exceptions to prohibitions in possession, sale, distribution, manufacture or advertisement of electronic, mechanical or other devices) in a course approved by the Pennsylvania State Police shall be an investigative or law enforcement officer as defined under 18 Pa.C.S. § 5702 (relating to definitions). Such officers may wear an electronic, mechanical or other device in the performance of their official duties. This subsection shall not apply to a deputy Game Commission officer or deputy wildlife conservation officer.]* * *Section 5. The definition of "law enforcement officer" in section 67A01 of Title 42 is amended to read:§ 67A01. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Law enforcement officer." [A member of the Pennsylvania State Police, an individual employed as a police officer who holds a current certificate under 53 Pa.C.S. Ch. 21 Subch. D (relating to municipal police education and training), a sheriff or a deputy sheriff.] Any of the following:(1) A member of the Pennsylvania State Police.(2) An individual employed as a police officer who holds a current certificate under 53 Pa.C.S. Ch. 21 Subch. D (relating to municipal police education and training).(3) An agent of the Office of Attorney General as described under paragraph (2) of the definition of 20250SB0520PN1010 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "enforcement officer" in 71 Pa.C.S. § 5102 (relating to definitions).(4) A sheriff or a deputy sheriff.(5) Waterways conservation officers or deputy waterways conservation officers as the terms are defined under 30 Pa.C.S. § 102 (relating to definitions).(6) An officer as defined under 34 Pa.C.S. § 102 (relating to definitions).(7) An individual employed by the Department of Conservation and Natural Resources who is vested with powers of arrest under section 302(c) or 303(a)(7) of the act of June 28, 1995 (P.L.89, No.18), known as the Conservation and Natural Resources Act.(8) An agent as defined in 61 Pa.C.S. § 6101 (relating to definitions).(9) An individual employed by the Department of Corrections Bureau of Investigations and Intelligence holding a police officer commission under the act of May 21, 1943 (P.L.469, No.210), entitled "An act providing for commissioning as police officers certain employes of institutions maintained in whole or in part by the Commonwealth; conferring upon them the powers of constables in certain cases; and imposing duties on wardens and keepers of jails, police stations and lock-ups."* * *Section 6. Section 67A07(a) introductory paragraph of Title 42 is amended to read:§ 67A07. Audio recording or video recording policies.(a) Policies.--A [municipal] law enforcement agency [or sheriff] that makes audio recordings or video recordings of 20250SB0520PN1010 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 communications under circumstances within paragraph (2) of the definition of "oral communication" in 18 Pa.C.S. § 5702 (relating to definitions) shall comply with the guidelines established under 18 Pa.C.S. § 5706(b)(4), (5) and (6) (relating to exceptions to prohibitions in possession, sale, distribution, manufacture or advertisement of electronic, mechanical or other devices) and shall establish written policies, which shall be public, for the following:* * *SECTION 7. SECTION 6171 OF TITLE 61 IS AMENDED BY ADDING A SUBSECTION TO READ:§ 6171. POWERS AND DUTIES OF DEPARTMENT.* * *(D) NOTICE TO PAROLEES OF INTERCEPTED COMMUNICATIONS.--UPON BEING GRANTED PAROLE, AN OFFENDER SHALL BE PROVIDED WRITTEN NOTICE THAT ANY COMMUNICATION MADE IN THE PRESENCE OF AN AGENT MAY BE INTERCEPTED BY AN AGENT USING AN ELECTRONIC, MECHANICAL OR OTHER DEVICE WHICH HAS BEEN APPROVED UNDER 18 PA.C.S. § 5706(B)(4) (RELATING TO EXCEPTIONS TO PROHIBITIONS IN POSSESSION, SALE, DISTRIBUTION, MANUFACTURE OR ADVERTISEMENT OF ELECTRONIC, MECHANICAL OR OTHER DEVICES).Section 7 8. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for fiscal year 2025-2026:(1) $213,200 of the money allocated to the Pennsylvania Gaming Control Board under 4 Pa.C.S. § 1408(c) (relating to transfers from State Gaming Fund) for local law enforcement grants shall be transferred to the Public Protection Law Enforcement Restricted Account for the purpose of implementing the provisions of this act by the Office of Attorney General.20250SB0520PN1010 - 8 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) $719,550 of the money allocated to the Pennsylvania Gaming Control Board under 4 Pa.C.S. § 1408(c) for local law enforcement grants shall be transferred to the State Parks User Fees Restricted Receipts Account for the purpose of implementing the provisions of this act by the Department of Conservation and Natural Resources.Section 8 9. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0520PN1010 - 9 - <--1234567